Washington statutes.
RCW 41.76.025

Bargaining unit determination—Hearings.

In any dispute concerning membership in the bargaining unit or the allocation of employees or positions to a bargaining unit, the commission, after a hearing or hearings, shall determine the dispute.

[ 2002 c 356 s 8.]